Wisconsin, session 2025, AB362.
do enact as follows:AB362,11Section 1. 118.07 (6) of the statutes is created to read:AB362,2,22118.07 (6) (a) In this subsection:AB362,2,431. “Cardiac emergency response plan” means a written document that 4establishes specific steps to reduce death from cardiac arrest in a specific setting.AB362,2,552. “Core elements” means all of the following:AB362,2,66a. A cardiac emergency response team.AB362,2,87b. A plan to activate the cardiac emergency response team in the event of a 8cardiac arrest.AB362,2,99c. Distribution of the cardiac emergency response plan on school grounds.AB362,3,21d. Information about automated external defibrillator placement and routine 2maintenance of automated external defibrillators.AB362,3,33e. Incorporation of local emergency medical services.AB362,3,44f. Annual practice of the cardiac emergency response plan using drills.AB362,3,55g. Annual review and evaluation of the cardiac emergency response plan.AB362,3,76h. Following each activation of the cardiac emergency response plan, a review 7of the cardiac emergency response plan and its implementation.AB362,3,148(b) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, each school board and operator of a 9charter school shall have in effect a cardiac emergency response plan for each school 10under its control. A cardiac emergency response plan under this paragraph shall 11address appropriate use of school personnel to respond to an individual 12experiencing sudden cardiac arrest while on school property. A school board or 13operator of a charter school shall include in a cardiac emergency response plan 14under this paragraph at least all of the following:AB362,3,15151. The core elements.AB362,3,19162. Requirements for automated external defibrillator placement, including 17that each automated external defibrillator is placed in accordance with guidelines 18set by the American Heart Association or an organization focused on emergency 19cardiovascular care.AB362,3,24203. Ongoing training for identified school personnel in first aid, 21cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and automated external defibrillator use that 22follows guidelines set by the American Heart Association, American Red Cross, or 23another nationally recognized organization focused on emergency cardiovascular 24care.AB362,4,81(c) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, each school board that operates the 2high school grades and operator of a charter school that operates the high school 3grades shall have in effect a cardiac emergency response plan that addresses the 4appropriate use of coaches, athletic trainers, and other school personnel to respond 5to an individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest while attending or 6participating in a school-sponsored athletic practice or competition. The school 7board or operator of a charter school shall include in each cardiac emergency 8response plan under this paragraph at least all of the following:AB362,4,991. The core elements.AB362,4,12102. That an automated external defibrillator placement be clearly marked and 11accessible in an unlocked location at each athletic venue during practices and 12competitions.AB362,4,17133. That each athletic coach employed by the school obtain and maintain 14certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator 15use that follows guidelines set by the American Heart Association, American Red 16Cross, or another nationally recognized organization focused on emergency 17cardiovascular care.AB362,4,2118(d) In developing a cardiac emergency response plan under par. (b) or (c), a 19school board or operator of a charter school shall consider recommendations by the 20American Heart Association, Project ADAM, or another nationally recognized 21organization focused on emergency cardiovascular care.AB362,5,322(e) Notwithstanding pars. (b) 2. and (c) 2., no school board or operator of a 23charter school is required to comply with a requirement in its cardiac emergency 24response plan under par. (b) or (c) to place an automated external defibrillator in 1accordance with the cardiac emergency response plan unless the office of school 2safety in the department of justice awards grants under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this 3act), section 2 (1).AB362,24Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB362,5,55(1) Cardiac emergency response plan; implementation grants.AB362,5,96(a) In the 2026-27 school year, subject to par. (b), the office of school safety in 7the department of justice may award grants to school boards and operators of 8charter schools to comply with requirements under s. 118.07 (6). A recipient of a 9grant under this paragraph may use the amount received for any of the following:AB362,5,10101. Automated external defibrillators.AB362,5,11112. Cardiopulmonary resuscitation training.AB362,5,12123. Cardiopulmonary resuscitation training supplies and materials.AB362,5,1713(b) The office of school safety in the department of justice shall determine the 14amount of a grant under par. (a) on the basis of the grade levels offered by the 15schools that are covered by the cardiac emergency response plans established under 16s. 118.07 (6). The office of school safety may not award a grant under par. (a) in an 17amount that is greater than the following:AB362,5,18181. For a high school, $8,000.AB362,5,19192. For a school that offers grades 6 to 8, $4,000.AB362,5,20203. For a school that offers only grades kindergarten to 5, $2,000.AB362,5,2121